Missouri, session 2026, HB2032.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.2058, to read as follows:
1.2058. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Guidelines for
User Age-Verification and Responsible Dialogue Act of 2026" or the "GUARD Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) (a) "Companion chatbot", an artificial intelligence system with a natural
language interface that is made publicly available in this state and is designed to meet a
user's emotional or social needs by providing adaptive, human-like responses to user
inputs by doing all of the following:
a. Retaining information of prior interactions or user sessions and user
preferences to personalize the interaction and facilitate ongoing user engagement with
the companion product;
b. Asking unprompted or unsolicited emotion-based questions that go beyond a
contextual response to a user prompt; and
c. Sustaining an ongoing dialogue across multiple interactions or sessions with a
user concerning matters personal to the user.
(b) "Companion chatbot" does not include any of the following:
a. A chatbot that is used primarily for customer service, a business' operational
purposes, productivity and analysis related to source information, internal research, or
technical assistance;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2032 2
b. A chatbot that is a feature of a video game and limited to replies related to the
video game, and cannot discuss topics related to mental health, self-harm, sexually
explicit conduct, or maintain a dialogue on other topics unrelated to the video game;
c. A consumer electronic device that incorporates a speaker and voice command
interface or text interface and acts as a voice- or text-activated virtual assistant; or
d. A chatbot used by a partnership, corporation, or state or local government
agency solely for internal purposes or employee health or productivity;
(2) "Covered entity", any person who owns, operates, or otherwise makes
available a companion chatbot to individuals in this state;
(3) "Minor", any person seventeen years of age or under;
(4) "Reasonable age verification measure", a method that is authenticated to
relate to a user of a companion chatbot, including:
(a) A government-issued identification; or
(b) Any other commercially reasonable method that can reliably and accurately:
a. Determine whether a user is an adult; and
b. Prevent access by minors to companion chatbots, as required by subsection 6
of this section;
(5) "Reasonable age verification process", an age verification process employed
by a covered entity that:
(a) Uses one or more reasonable age verification measures in order to verify the
age of a user of a companion chatbot owned, operated, or otherwise made available by
the covered entity;
(b) Provides that requiring a user to confirm that the user is not a minor, or to
insert the user's birth date, is not sufficient to constitute a reasonable age verification
measure;
(c) Ensures that each user is subjected to each reasonable age verification
measure used by the covered entity as part of the age verification process; and
(d) Does not base verification of a user's age on factors such as whether the user
shares an internet protocol address, hardware identifier, or other technical indicator
with another user determined not to be a minor;
(6) "Sexually explicit conduct", the same meaning as defined under section
573.010.
3. (1) It shall be unlawful to design, develop, or make available a companion
chatbot knowing or with reckless disregard for the fact that the companion chatbot
poses a risk of soliciting, encouraging, or inducing minors to:
(a) Engage in, describe, or simulate sexually explicit conduct; or

HCS HB 2032 3
(b) Create or transmit any visual depiction of sexually explicit conduct,
including any visual depiction described in section 573.010.
(2) Any person who violates subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be fined not
more than one hundred thousand dollars per offense.
4. (1) It shall be unlawful to design, develop, or make available a companion
chatbot knowing or with reckless disregard for the fact that the companion chatbot
encourages, promotes, or coerces suicide, nonsuicidal self-injury, or imminent physical
or sexual violence.
(2) Any person who violates subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be fined not
more than one hundred thousand dollars per offense.
5. (1) A covered entity shall require each individual accessing a companion
chatbot to make a user account in order to use or otherwise interact with such chatbot.
(2) (a) With respect to each user account of a companion chatbot that exists as of
August 28, 2026, a covered entity shall:
a. On such date, freeze any such account;
b. In order to restore the functionality of such account, require that the user
provide age data that is verifiable using a reasonable age verification process, subject to
paragraph (d) of this subdivision; and
c. Using such age data, classify each user as a minor or an adult.
(b) At the time an individual creates a new user account to use or interact with a
companion chatbot, a covered entity shall:
a. Request age data from the individual;
b. Verify the individual's age using a reasonable age verification process, subject
to paragraph (d) of this subdivision; and
c. Using such age data, classify each user as a minor or an adult.
(c) A covered entity shall periodically review previously verified user accounts
using a reasonable age verification process, subject to paragraph (d) of this subdivision,
to ensure compliance with this section.
(d) For purposes of subparagraph b. of paragraph (a) of this subdivision,
subparagraph b. of paragraph (b) of this subdivision, and paragraph (c) of this
subdivision, a covered entity may contract with a third party to employ reasonable age
verification measures as part of the covered entity's reasonable age verification process,
but the use of such third party shall not relieve the covered entity of its obligations
under this section or from liability under this section.
(e) A covered entity shall:
a. Establish, implement, and maintain reasonable data security to:

HCS HB 2032 4
(i) Limit collection of personal data to that which is minimally necessary to
verify a user's age or maintain compliance with this section; and
(ii) Protect such age verification data against unauthorized access;
b. Protect such age verification data against unauthorized access;
c. Protect the integrity and confidentiality of such data by only transmitting such
data using industry-standard encryption protocols;
d. Retain such data for no longer than is reasonably necessary to verify a user's
age or maintain compliance with this section; and
e. Not share with, transfer to, or sell to any other entity such data.
100 (3) (a) Each companion chatbot made available to users shall:
101 a. At the initiation of each conversation with a user and at thirty-minute
102 intervals, clearly and conspicuously disclose to the user that the chatbot is an artificial
103 intelligence system and not a human being; and
104 b. Be programmed to ensure that the chatbot does not claim to be a human being
105 or otherwise respond deceptively when asked by a user if the chatbot is a human being.
106 (b) a. A companion chatbot shall not represent, directly or indirectly, that the
107 chatbot is a licensed professional, including a therapist, physician, lawyer, financial
108 advisor, or other professional.
109 b. Each companion chatbot made available to users shall, at the initiation of each
110 conversation with a user and at reasonably regular intervals, clearly and conspicuously
111 disclose to the user that:
112 (i) The chatbot does not provide medical, legal, financial, or psychological
113 services; and
114 (ii) Users of the chatbot should consult a licensed professional for such advice.
115 6. If the age verification process described in subdivision (2) of subsection 5 of
116 this section determines that an individual is a minor, a covered entity shall prohibit the
117 minor from accessing or using any companion chatbot owned, operated, or otherwise
118 made available by the covered entity.
119 7. (1) In the case of a violation of subsection 5 or 6 of this section, or a rule or
120 regulation promulgated thereunder, the attorney general may bring a civil action in an
121 appropriate circuit court to:
122 (a) Enjoin the violation;
123 (b) Enforce compliance with subsection 5 or 6 of this section, or any rules or
124 regulations promulgated thereunder; or
125 (c) Obtain civil penalties under subdivision (3) of this subsection, restitution, or
126 other appropriate relief.

HCS HB 2032 5
127 (2) (a) For the purpose of conducting investigations or bringing enforcement
128 actions under this section, the attorney general may issue subpoenas, administer oaths,
129 and compel the production of documents or testimony.
130 (b) The attorney general may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for
131 the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
132 in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
133 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
134 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
135 and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
136 review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
137 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
138 adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
139 (3) (a) Any person who violates subsection 5 or 6 of this section, or any rule or
140 regulation promulgated thereunder, shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one
141 hundred thousand dollars for each violation.
142 (b) Each violation described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision shall be
143 considered a separate violation.
144 (4) In any case in which the attorney general has reason to believe that an
145 interest of the residents of this state has been or is being threatened or adversely affected
146 by the engagement of any covered entity in a violation of this section, or any rule or
147 regulation promulgated thereunder, the attorney general, as parens patriae, may bring a
148 civil action on behalf of the residents of this state in a circuit court of this state with
149 appropriate jurisdiction to obtain injunctive relief.
✔